Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2088.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1289.24, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1289.24.


FIREARM REGULATION – STATE PREEMPTION


A. 1. The State Legislature hereby occupies and preempts the


entire field of legislation in this state touching in any way


firearms, air powered air-powered pistols, air powered air-powered


rifles, knives, firearm and ammunition components, ammunition and


supplies to the complete exclusion of any order, policy, ordinance,


resolution, or regulation by any municipality, agency, or other

Req. No. 3450 Page 1


political subdivision of this state. Any existing or future orders,


policies, ordinances, resolutions, or regulations in this field,


except as provided for in paragraph 2 of this subsection and


subsection C of this section, are null and void.


2. A municipality may adopt any ordinance:


a. relating to the discharge of firearms within the


jurisdiction of the municipality,


b. allowing the municipality to issue a traffic citation


for transporting a firearm improperly as provided for


in Section 1289.13A of this title,; provided, however,


that penalties contained for violation of any


ordinance enacted pursuant to the provisions of this


subparagraph shall not exceed the penalties


established in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, and


c. allowing the municipality to issue a citation to an


individual or the parent or guardian of a minor who


discharges an air powered air-powered pistol or air


powered air-powered rifle in an intentional or


negligent manner which causes the projectile to leave


the intended premises.


3. As provided in the preemption provisions of this section,


the otherwise lawful carrying or possession of a firearm under the


provisions of Chapter 53 of this title shall not be punishable by


any municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of this

Req. No. 3450 Page 2


state as disorderly conduct, disturbing the peace or a similar


offense against public order.


4. A public or private school may create a policy regulating


the possession of knives on school property or in any school bus or


vehicle used by the school for purposes of transportation.


B. No municipality, agency, or other political subdivision of


this state shall adopt any order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or


regulation concerning in any way the sale, purchase, purchase delay,


transfer, ownership, use, keeping, possession, carrying, bearing,


transportation, licensing, permit, registration, taxation other than


sales and compensating use taxes or other controls on firearms,


knives, firearm and ammunition components, ammunition and supplies.


C. Except as hereinafter provided, this This section shall not


be construed to prohibit any order, policy, ordinance, resolution,


or regulation by any municipality concerning the confiscation of


property used in violation of the ordinances of the municipality as


provided for in Section 28-121 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Provided, however, no municipal ordinance relating to transporting a


firearm or knife improperly may include a provision for confiscation


of property.


D. When a person’s rights pursuant to the protection of the


preemption provisions of this section have been violated by any


order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation promulgated or


enforced by any person, municipality, agency, or other political

Req. No. 3450 Page 3


subdivision of this state, the person whose rights have been


violated shall have the right to bring a civil action against the


persons person, government employee if the government employee was


acting beyond the scope of employment, municipality, and agency, or


political subdivision jointly and severally for injunctive relief or


monetary damages or both.


E. A court may require the person, municipality, agency, or


political subdivision to pay court costs, expert witness fees, and


attorney fees to the aggrieved party in a civil action filed


pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of this section if:


1. The aggrieved party provides written notice of the unlawful


order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation by certified,


first-class mail or service of process to the clerk of the


municipality or to the designated agent of the municipality, agency,


or political subdivision and allows the person, municipality,


agency, or political subdivision ninety (90) days to rescind,


repeal, or otherwise abrogate the order, policy, ordinance,


resolution, or regulation; and


2. A court rules in favor of the aggrieved person whose rights


were violated and the issue in controversy is governed by previously


settled law.


If the person, municipality, agency, or political subdivision


fails to rescind, repeal, or otherwise abrogate the unlawful order,


policy, ordinance, resolution, or regulation within ninety (90) days

Req. No. 3450 Page 4


of the required notice, as provided in paragraph 1 of this


subsection, and the order, policy, ordinance, resolution, or


regulation is subsequently rescinded, repealed, or otherwise


abrogated after the aggrieved party files suit, the aggrieved party


shall retain standing in the civil action and may recover damages,


court costs, expert witness fees, and attorney fees.


F. As used in this section, air powered pistol “air-powered


pistol” or air powered rifle is “air-powered rifle” means any pistol


or rifle that uses compressed air or other compressed gas to project


plastic BB-like or pellet-like projectiles at a speed not exceeding


400 four hundred (400) feet per second.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3450 BRC 1/15/2026 12:22:42 PM





















Req. No. 3450 Page 5